Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 2. Change to Irrigation District

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-7-830.
Authority.

The landowners in a public irrigation and power district organized under W.S.

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

shall have the right to convert such district into an irrigation district as provided for in chapter 122, article 7, Wyoming Revised Statutes 1931, having all the rights and powers as though originally created under the provisions of said chapter 122, article 7, Wyoming Revised Statutes 1931.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 14 § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-1301; W.S. 1957, § 41-343.

Cross references. —

As to division of drainage district, see §§

41-9-301

through

41-9-306

.

Disposition of art. 7, ch. 122, W.R.S. 1931. —

Chapter 122, article 7, Wyoming Revised Statutes 1931, appears herein as §§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

,

41-7-601

through

41-7-603

,

41-7-1001

through 1006.

§ 41-7-831.
Resolution of board of directors.

In order to effect such change the board of directors shall pass a resolution stating that it is the desire of the board to transform said district into an irrigation district as provided in chapter 122, article 7, Wyoming Revised Statutes 1931 and said resolution shall fix the time and place of holding an election within the district to determine whether or not the transformation shall be made.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 14, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-1302; W.S. 1957, § 41-344.

Cross references. —

As to board of directors generally, see §§

41-7-805

,

41-7-806

.

Disposition of art. 7, ch. 122, W.R.S. 1931. —

See note to §

41-7-830

.

§ 41-7-832.
Election; notice.

Immediately after the adoption of the resolution by the board the secretary of the district shall proceed to give notice of the time and place of holding such election in the manner following:

By serving or causing to be served a copy of the notice stating the time, place and object of the election on each person owning or entitled to possession by virtue of public filing of land within the district residing in any county in which any lands of the district are situated either personally or by leaving a copy thereof at his usual place of abode, with a person of suitable age and discretion, and by registered mail to any mortgagee, mortgagees or judgment lien holder whose mortgage or judgment lien and address is of record in the record of said liens in the county or counties in which said district is situated; and

By publishing a copy of said notice at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in each county within which any of the lands of the district are situated, giving the time, place and object of said election;

If any of the persons owning or entitled to possession of land in said district are nonresidents of the county or counties in which the district lies, such notice of time, place and object of the election shall be sent by registered mail to such nonresidents if their addresses are known and if unknown the secretary shall make an affidavit so stating. Such notice to be mailed within two (2) days after the first publication. Notice of the time, place and object of the election must be given at least twenty (20) days before the date of election.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 14, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-1303; W.S. 1957, § 41-345.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-833.
Election; procedure.

At the time and place for holding the election, the president of the district board shall read the notice of election and call the roll of those entitled to vote and the number of votes to which each is entitled. Every person owning or entitled to possession by virtue of public filing of land within the district shall be entitled to cast one (1) vote for each acre of land held within the district at such election. The board of directors shall keep a record of all qualified voters present, receive all proxies and prescribe the manner of canvassing votes. All proxies shall be in writing and signed by the person entitled to vote. The vote of a majority of the owners of land or persons entitled to possession of land in the district by virtue of public filing of land and representing at least one-third of the lands within the district shall be necessary to make effective the transformation of the district to a district under chapter 122, article 7, Wyoming Revised Statutes 1931.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 14, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-1304; W.S. 1957, § 41-346.

Disposition of art. 7, ch. 122, W.R.S. 1931. —

See note to §

41-7-830

.

§ 41-7-834.
Filing of certificate of change.

If the vote shows that the transformation has been authorized by the district, the secretary shall file a certificate to that effect in the office of the clerk of court in the counties embraced within the district and a duplicate copy with the state engineer; thereafter said district shall proceed to act under the provisions of chapter 122, article 7, Wyoming Revised Statutes 1931, and any and all acts supplementary thereto or amendatory thereof and shall have all of the rights, powers and obligations as if originally organized under said chapter and article.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 14, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-1305; W.S. 1957, § 41-347.

Disposition of art. 7, ch. 122, W.R.S. 1931. —

See note to §

41-7-830

.

§ 41-7-835.
Construction.

This act [§§

41-7-830

through

41-7-835

] shall not be construed as repealing or in any way affecting the provisions of W.S.

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 14, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-1306; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1943, ch. 14, § 7, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.